Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8316
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of the Discount Medical Plan Organization Act.

Laws 2008, LB855, § 48.